Illinois, session 104th, SB2986.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Unified Code of Corrections is amended by 5adding Section 3-7-10 as follows: 6    (730 ILCS 5/3-7-10 new)7    Sec. 3-7-10. Tattoo removal; pilot program.8    (a) In this Section: 9    "Body art" means the practice of physical body adornment, 10including, but not limited to, body piercing, tattooing, 11cosmetic tattooing, branding, and scarification.  "Body art" 12does not include (i) practices that are considered medical 13procedures by the Illinois State Medical Board or (ii) 14piercing of the non-cartilaginous portion or lobe of the ear 15with pre-sterilized single-use stud-and-clasp ear-piercing 16systems. 17    "Body artist" means a practitioner of body art. 18    "Gang tattoo" means a tattoo designated by the Director of 19Corrections as a symbol of a specific gang as defined in 20Section 10 of the Illinois Streetgang Terrorism Omnibus 21Prevention Act. 22    "Tattoo" means an indelible mark or figure visible through 23the skin of a human being, caused by pricking with a needle,   SB2986- 2 -LRB104 20393 RLC 33853 b1machine, or other means. 2    (b) The Director of Corrections shall establish a 5-year 3pilot program in 3 institutions or facilities of the 4Department of Corrections to permit a committed person who has 5a gang tattoo to have that tattoo removed by a physician, 6physician assistant, or registered nurse licensed in this 7State or by a person who has a certificate of registration 8issued by the Department of Public Health under the Tattoo and 9Body Piercing Establishment Registration Act to operate a 10tattoo and body piercing establishment. The institutions or 11facilities selected by the Director shall be provided with 12equipment and sanitary needs to accomplish the removal of the 13tattoos in a safe manner, including medical-grade cosmetic 14laser removal equipment. 15    (c) The Director of Corrections, in consultation with the 16Department of Public Health, shall establish a body artist 17training program in the institutions or facilities described 18in subsection (b) that would qualify a committed person to be 19qualified to operate a body art establishment upon release 20from the correctional institution or facility. A committed 21person who qualifies for the training program shall be 22permitted to observe the body tattoo removal procedure but may 23not perform the procedure or handle the equipment used in the 24procedure. The Director of Corrections shall authorize the 25chief administrative officer of the selected correctional 26institutions or facilities to choose committed persons with   SB2986- 3 -LRB104 20393 RLC 33853 b1good conduct and who are to be released within a year to train 2as body artists. The Department of Public Health shall 3establish the curriculum for the program and the length of the 4program. Upon completion of the training program, the 5committed persons shall take a test to determine proficiency 6as a body artist. Upon the successful passage of the test, the 7committed persons shall be qualified to receive a certificate 8of registration from the Department of Public Health to 9operate a body art establishment upon release from the 10correctional institution or facility. 11    (d) A committed person in a designated pilot institution 12or facility of the Department who has a gang tattoo may have 13that tattoo removed by a person authorized in subsection (b). 14    (e) If the balance in the committed person's Residents' 15Benefit Fund, as described in Section 3-4-3, is $500 or more, 16the moneys in the Fund shall be used to pay for the committed 17person's gang tattoo removal. If the balance in the committed 18person's Residents' Benefit Fund is less than $500, the 19committed person shall receive the tattoo removal free of 20charge. 21    (f) The Director shall establish reasonable costs to be 22charged to a committed person with at least a $500 balance in 23the committed person' Residents' Benefit Fund who has his or 24her gang tattoo removed.